North Dakota, session 69, HB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-02-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
24-02-02.1. Agreement for the construction of the Oahe bridge.
The director is authorized to execute an agreement with the federal government for the construction
of a bridge over the Oahe Reservoir wherein the department agrees to hold the United States harmless
and free from damages due to the construction or operation and maintenance of such bridge, except for
damages due to the fault or negligence of the United States or its contractors. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the director is authorized to accept ownership of or otherwise place onto the
state highway system, a bridge and connecting roadway over the Oahe Reservoi r .

H. B. NO. 1056 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1056.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State